Maryland, session 2026, HB1498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
32–102.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1498*

HOUSE BILL 1498
This title applies only in Wicomico County.
32–901.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “RETAIL FLOOR SPACE” MEANS THE AREA OF AN
ESTABLISHMENT WHERE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND OTHER ITEMS ARE
DISPLAYED FOR SALE AND SOLD.
(B) There is a Class A beer, wine, and liquor license.
[(b)] (C) (1) (I) [A] BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, A license may be issued only
to an establishment that has been:
[(i)] 1. issued a Class B license; and
[(ii)] 2. continually operating as a restaurant in the county since
at least 3 months before the application for the license.
(II) ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, A LICENSE:
1. MAY NOT BE ISSUED TO AN ESTABLISHMENT THAT HAS
BEEN ISSUED A CLASS B LICENSE; AND
2. MAY BE RENEWED FOR AN ESTABLISHMENT THAT HAS
A CLASS B LICENSE THAT WAS ISSUED BEFORE JULY 1, 2026.
(2) The Board may not issue a license to an establishment that is a
corporation or limited liability company unless the license applicant owns 75% of the total
issued capital stock of the corporation or the limited liability company.
(3) The Board may issue:
(I) NOT MORE THAN ONE LICENSE IN A COUNCILMANIC
DISTRICT; AND
(II) not more than A TOTAL OF three licenses in the county.
(4) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE TO AN ESTABLISHMENT
WITH RETAIL FLOOR SPACE OF MORE THAN 3,500 SQUARE FEET.
[(c)] (D) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the license authorizes
the license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor, at retail at the place described in the
application, for off–premises consumption.

HOUSE BILL 1498 3
(2) [The] FOR A LICENSE ISSUED TO A CLASS B LICENSE HOLDER
BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE place described in the application:
(i) may not exceed 20% of the area normally used in the operation
of the restaurant business; and
(ii) shall be contiguous to and adjoin the restaurant establishment.
[(d)] (E) The license may not be issued for a drugstore unless the applicant:
(1) has been doing business at the location applied for in the license for at
least 1 year before the date of the application for the license;
(2) is the assignee of a business established for at least 1 year before the
date of the application for the license at the location applied for; or
(3) has been engaged in the retail drug business for at least 3 years.
[(e)] (F) (1) The license holder shall purchase liquor for retail sale from a
county dispensary or from a wholesaler.
(2) A dispensary may not charge the license holder more than 15% above
the wholesale operating cost to the dispensary.
[(f)] (G) The annual license fee is $4,400 and is in addition to [the] ANY fee
THAT MAY BE paid for [the] A Class B license.
32–1502.
The prohibitions against one person being issued more than one license under §
4–203 of this article do not apply to:
(1) a Class 6 pub–brewery license issued under § 2–208 of this article or a
Class 7 micro–brewery license issued under § 2–209 of this article; [or]
(2) A CLASS A BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE ISSUED UNDER §
32–901 OF THIS TITLE BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, TO A HOLDER OF A CLASS B LICENSE;
OR
(3) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license issued under § 32–902 of this
article if:
(i) the resident applicant is a resident of the county at the time of
application; and

HOUSE BILL 1498
(ii) the minimum capital investment in the premises is at least
$200,000 or the premises have a fair market value of at least $200,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.